Utah statutes.
26-52-201.   Autism Treatment Account.

(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as the Autism Treatment Account.

(2)  The account shall consist of:

(a)  gifts, grants, devises, donations, and bequests of real property, personal property, or services, from any source, or any other conveyance that may be made to the account from private sources;

(b)  interest and other earnings derived from the account money; and

(c)  any additional amounts as appropriated by the Legislature.

(3) (a)  Except as provided under Subsection (3)(b), the executive director shall be responsible for administering the account.

(b)  The committee shall be responsible for the following actions in relation to the account, consistent with the requirements of this title:

(i)  prioritizing and allocating uses for account money, as permitted under Subsection (4);

(ii)  determining what providers or organizations qualify for disbursements from the account for services rendered; and

(iii)  authorization of all other distributions from the account, except that disbursements for expenses authorized under Subsection (6) shall also require the approval of the executive director.

(4)  Account money may be used to:

(a)  assist with the cost of evaluating and treating persons with an autism spectrum disorder;

(b)  provide persons with an autism spectrum disorder with treatments that utilize early intensive behavior therapy; and

(c)  provide grants to persons or organizations for providing the services described in Subsection (4)(a) or (b).

(5)  An individual who receives services that are paid for from the account or who receives services through an organization or provider that receives payment from the account shall:

(a)  be a resident of Utah;

(b)  have been diagnosed by a qualified professional as having an autism spectrum disorder;

(c)  be younger than eight years of age; and

(d)  have a need that can be met within the requirements of this title.

(6)  All actual and necessary operating expenses for the committee and staff shall be paid by the account.

(7)  Account money may not be used for administrative or other expenses of the Department of Health that are not normally provided for by legislative appropriation.

(8)  All interest and other earnings derived from the account money shall be deposited into the account.

(9)  The state treasurer shall invest the money in the account under Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.

